Hawaii statutes.
§448-21 Criminal penalties. Any person
who violates, or fails to comply with, any of the provisions of this chapter,
where a criminal penalty is not otherwise provided, shall be fined not more
than $500 or imprisoned not more than six months, and each day's violation or
failure to comply with the provisions hereof shall be deemed a separate
offense.

Upon any subsequent conviction under this
section, the person shall be fined not more than $1,000 and imprisoned not more
than one year.

All tools, implements, medicines, and drugs
used by any person in the practice of dentistry without a license, shall be
seized by the officers of the law, and upon conviction of the person for any
violation of this chapter, the tools, implements, medicines, and drugs shall be
declared forfeited to the State by the court and ordered destroyed. [L 1903, c
40, §15; am L 1917, c 136, §8; am L 1919, c 52, §1; RL 1925, §1081; am L 1929,
c 159, §1; RL 1935, §996; am L 1935, c 87, §1; RL 1945, §2168; RL 1955, §61-21;
HRS §448-21; am L 1986, c 26, §4]

Cross References

Classification of offense and authorized punishment, see
§§701-107, 706-640, and 706-663.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next